en: Migros M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 5/5, M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 5/5
xx: Migros M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 5/5, M-Check Environmentally Compatible Constituent Materials 5/5
de: Migros M-Check Umweltverträgliche Inhaltsstoffe 5/5, M-Check Umweltverträgliche Inhaltsstoffe 5/5
fr: Migros M-Check Composants respectueux de l’environnement 5/5, M-Check Composants respectueux de l’environnement 5/5
it: Migros M-Check Componenti ecocompatibili 5/5, M-Check Componenti ecocompatibili 5/5

en: Naturaplan, Natura-plan
xx: Naturaplan
nl: Naturaplan

en: Irradiated, Irradiated food
de: Bestrahlt, bestrahlte Nahrung
es: Irradiado, Alimentos irradiados
fi: Säteilytetty
fr: Traité par rayonnement ionisant, Traité par rayonnements ionisants, traité par ionisation, ionisé, irradié
it: Irradiato, Alimenti irradiati
nl: Bestraald, Bestraalde voeding
pl: Poddane promieniowaniu, Promieniowane żywność
pt: Alimentos Irradiados, Irradiados

en: Tooth-health related labels
de: Labels zur Zahngesundheit
fi: Hammasterveyttä koskevat merkit
fr: Labels liés à la santé des dents
it: Etichette relative alla salute dei denti
nl: Gebitsgezondheidslabels

en: UFSBD
fr: Union française pour la santé bucco-dentaire, UFSBD

en: NAPSI certified, NAPSI
ca: Certificat NAPSI
fi: NAPSI-sertifioitu
fr: Certifiée NAPSI, Certifié NAPSI
nl: NAPSI certificatie

en: New
bg: Ново
ca: Nou
da: Nyhed, Ny
de: Neu
es: Nuevo
fi: Uutuus, uusi
fr: Nouveau
he: חדש
hu: Új
it: Nuovo
nl: Nieuw
pl: Nowość, Nowy, Nowe
pt: Novo, novidade
ru: Новинка
sv: Nyhet
th: สินค้าใหม่
tr: Yeni

en: New recipe
bg: Нова рецепта
ca: Nova recepta
da: Ny opskrift
de: Neues Rezept
es: Nueva receta
fi: uusi resepti
fr: Nouvelle recette
he: מתכון חדש
hu: Új recept
it: Nuova ricetta
nl: Nieuw recept
pt: Receita nova, nova receita
th: สูตรใหม่

en: New flavour, New taste
bg: Нов вкус
ca: Nou sabor
da: Ny smag
de: Neuer Geschmack
es: Nuevo sabor
fi: Uusi maku
fr: Nouveau goût, nouvelle saveur
he: טעם חדש
hu: Új íz
it: Nuovo sapore
nl: Nieuwe smaak
pl: Nowy smak
pt: Novo sabor
ru: Новый вкус
sv: Ny smak
th: รสชาติใหม่
tr: Yeni tat

en: 2016 Nutrition labelling experiment
ca: Experiment d’etiquetatge nutricional 2016
fi: Ravintomerkintäkokeilu 2016
fr: Experimentation Etiquetage Nutritionnel 2016
it: Esperimento di etichettatura nutrizionale 2016
nl: 2016 Voedingslabel experiment

en: Nutriscore experiment
ca: Experiment Nutriscore
de: Nutriscore-Experiment
es: Experimentación Nutriscore
fi: Nutriscore-kokeilu
fr: Expérimentation Nutriscore
he: ניסוי Nutriscore
hr: Nutriscore eksperiment
it: Sperimentazione Nutriscore
nl: Nutriscore experiment

en: Nutriscore experiment Grade A
ca: Grau A NutriScore experimental
es: Experimentación Nutriscore A
fi: Nutriscore-kokeilu arvosana A
fr: Expérimentation Nutriscore A
hr: Nutriscore eksperiment oznaka A
it: Sperimentazione Nutriscore A
nl: Nutriscore experiment A

en: Nutriscore experiment Grade B
ca: Grau B NutriScore experimental
es: Experimentación Nutriscore B
fi: Nutriscore-kokeilu arvosana B
fr: Expérimentation Nutriscore B
hr: Nutriscore eksperiment oznaka B
it: Sperimentazione Nutriscore B
nl: Nutriscore experiment B

en: Nutriscore experiment Grade C
ca: Grau C NutriScore experimental
es: Experimentación Nutriscore C
fi: Nutriscore-kokeilu arvosana C
fr: Expérimentation Nutriscore C
hr: Nutriscore eksperiment oznaka C
it: Sperimentazione Nutriscore C
nl: Nutriscore experiment C

en: Nutriscore experiment Grade D
es: Experimentación Nutriscore D
fi: Nutriscore-kokeilu arvosana D
fr: Expérimentation Nutriscore D
hr: Nutriscore eksperiment oznaka D
it: Sperimentazione Nutriscore D
nl: Nutriscore experiment D

en: Nutriscore experiment Grade E
es: Experimentación Nutriscore E
fi: Nutriscore-kokeilu arvosana E
fr: Expérimentation Nutriscore E
hr: Nutriscore eksperiment oznaka E
it: Sperimentazione Nutriscore E
nl: Nutriscore experiment E

en: Nutriscore
xx: Nutriscore, Nutri-Score
ca: Nutri-Score, Comptador Nutricional, Nutriscore

en: Nutriscore Grade A
xx: Nutriscore A, Nutri-Score A
ca: Grau A Nutriscore
de: Nutriscore Note A
fi: Nutriscore-arvosana A
he: דירוג A ב־Nutriscore
hr: Nutriscore oznaka A
pt: Nutri-Score grau A

en: Nutriscore Grade B
xx: Nutriscore B, Nutri-Score B
ca: Grau B Nutriscore
fi: Nutriscore-arvosana B
he: דירוג B ב־Nutriscore
hr: Nutriscore oznaka B
pt: Nutri-Score grau B

en: Nutriscore Grade C
xx: Nutriscore C, Nutri-Score C
ca: Grau C Nutriscore
fi: Nutriscore-arvosana C
he: דירוג C ב־Nutriscore
hr: Nutriscore oznaka C
pt: Nutri-Score grau C